Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
PART 3 Compensation of Persons for Injuries Sustained While Preventing Crime or Aiding Officers of the Law

Cross references.

Indemnification of law enforcement officers, firefighters, and prison guards for injury or death in line of duty, § 45-9-80 et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Compensation of persons for injuries sustained while preventing crime or aiding officer of the law, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Claims Advisory Board, Chapter 115-4.

Law reviews.

For article, “The New Special Master Rule — Uniform Superior Court Rule 46: Life Jackets for the Courts in the Perfect Storm,”
see 15 (No. 4) Ga. St. B.J. 20 (2009).

28-5-100.
Recommendations by board as to payment of compensation; procedural rules.

The Claims Advisory Board shall have authority to consider and make recommendations to the General Assembly concerning payment of compensation to innocent persons who sustain injury or property damage, or both, and to dependent heirs of innocent persons killed in attempting to prevent the commission of crime against the person of another or in aiding or attempting to aid officers of the law upon their request. In a particular case the board may appoint a special master to take testimony, supervise or conduct necessary investigations, and report to the board; but ultimate recommendation on any claim shall be made only by the board.

The board shall provide by rules for proceedings before it; and such rules shall emphasize, to the greatest extent possible, informality of proceedings. No claimant shall be required to be represented or accompanied by an attorney.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 712, § 1.

28-5-101.
Procedure for claims for compensation.

Any person who is eligible for compensation under this part must give notice thereof in accordance with Part 2 of Article 4 of this chapter in order to have such claim brought before the General Assembly for action.

Any such claimant shall also, prior to introduction of a resolution for compensation, submit all documents called for by the board, including reports from all physicians and surgeons who have treated or examined the victim and from hospitals that have admitted the victim in relation to the injury for which compensation is claimed at the time of or subsequent to the victim’s injury or death. If, in the opinion of the board, reports on the previous medical history of the victim, examination of the injured victim and a report thereon, or a report on the cause of death of the victim by an impartial medical expert would be of material aid in making its recommendation, the board shall call for the claimant to produce such reports and submit to such examination.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 712, § 2.

28-5-102.
Uniform standards for compensation.

In making its recommendation, the board shall, insofar as practicable, formulate standards for uniform application in recommending compensation, taking into consideration rates and amounts of compensation payable for injuries or property damage and death under other laws of this state and of the United States.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 712, § 3.

28-5-103.
When compensation may be recommended; factors to be considered in making recommendations as to compensation.

In any case in which a person is injured or sustains property damage or is killed by an incident for which compensation is authorized by this part, the board may recommend to the General Assembly payment of compensation:

To or for the benefit of the injured person;

In the case of personal injury of the victim, to any person responsible for the maintenance of the victim who has suffered pecuniary loss or incurred expenses as a result of such injury;

In the case of death of the victim, to or for the benefit of any one or more of the heirs at law of the victim, who at the time of the victim’s demise were dependent upon him for over half of their support; or

To or for the benefit of the owner of the damaged property.

In making its recommendation to the General Assembly, the board shall:

Consider a person to have intended an act, notwithstanding that by reason of age, insanity, drunkenness, or otherwise, he was legally incapable of forming a criminal intent;

Consider all circumstances surrounding the claim, including, but not limited to, provocation, consent, or any other behavior of the victim which directly or indirectly contributed to his injury or death; the prior case or social history, if any, of the victim or claimant; any need for financial aid present; and any other relevant matters; and

Take into consideration any amounts received or receivable from any other source or sources by the victim or his dependents as a result of the incident or offense giving rise to the claim.

Claims and recommendations may be made under this Code section regardless of whether or not any person is prosecuted or convicted of any offense arising out of such act.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 712, § 4.

28-5-104.
When award of compensation not to be recommended generally; limitations on amounts; action by General Assembly upon recommendations.

In no event shall the board recommend that compensation be awarded to:

Any victim of a criminal act not provided for in Code Section 28-5-100;

Anyone who:

Is a spouse, parent, grandparent, child (natural or adopted), grandchild, brother, sister, half brother, half sister, or parent of the spouse of the offender;

Was, at the time of the personal injury or death of the victim, living with the offender as a member of his or her family or household or maintaining a sexual relationship, whether illicit or not, with such person or with any member of the family of such person;

Violated a penal law of this state which violation caused or contributed to his or her injuries or death; or

Was injured as a result of the operation of a motor vehicle, boat, or airplane, unless the same was used as a weapon in a deliberate attempt to run the victim down;

Any officer of the law injured in the performance of his or her official duties; or

Any person who is or was at the time of the alleged loss an inmate in the custody of the Department of Corrections.

No compensation shall be recommended by the board in an amount exceeding $5,000.00 per claim.

The board shall, in an advisory way only, recommend to the General Assembly payment of compensation and the amount thereof; and the General Assembly shall act on such recommendation in accordance with law and the rules of the House and Senate for action upon such resolutions.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 712, §§ 5, 7; Ga. L. 1999, p. 798, § 2.

Law reviews.

For article advocating the overhaul of the doctrines of official and sovereign immunity in Georgia, see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 303 (1977).

For note analyzing sovereign immunity in this state and proposing implementation of a waiver scheme and creation of a court of claims pursuant to Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VI, Sec. V, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. II, Para. IX), see 27 Emory L.J. 717 (1978).

28-5-105.
Scope of compensation.

The General Assembly may by resolution appropriate money for payment of a claim for compensation upon the recommendation of the board for:

Expenses actually and reasonably incurred as a result of the personal injury or death of the victim; and

Loss of earning power as a result of total or partial incapacity of such victim.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 712, § 6.

28-5-106.
Limitations on claims.

No resolution for the payment of compensation under this part shall be adopted unless notice of claim has been filed with the board within 18 months after the date of the personal injury or death, the claim is otherwise presented in accordance with law, and the personal injury or death was the result of an incident or offense for which compensation is authorized by this part and which had been reported to an officer of the law within five days of its occurrence or, if the incident or offense could not reasonably have been reported within such period, within five days of the time when a report could reasonably have been made.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 712, § 7.

28-5-107.
Reports on claims transmitted to the General Assembly.

The board shall prepare and transmit to the General Assembly, along with its recommendation on each claim, a report of its activities in connection therewith, including the name of the claimant, a brief description of the facts surrounding the claim, the amount of compensation recommended, and the board’s reasons therefor.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 712, § 8.

28-5-108.
Subrogation of state to claims of persons compensated; damage actions against persons responsible for injuries or death.

Whenever an order for the payment of indemnification for personal injury or death or for damages to property is or has been made under this part, the State of Georgia shall, upon payment of the amount of the order, be subrogated to the cause of action of the person receiving indemnification under the order against the person or persons responsible for the injury or death or damages to property; and the Attorney General shall be authorized to bring an action against such person or persons for the amount of the damages sustained by the applicant. If an amount greater than that paid pursuant to the order for payment of indemnification is recovered and collected in any such action, the state, after deducting the expenses incurred, shall pay the balance to the person receiving indemnification under the order.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 712, § 9.